Tennessee statutes. Title 44 Animals And Animal Husbandry
Part 7

Commercial Breeder Act [Expired]

44-17-701. [Expired.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 7, §§44-17-701 —44-17-715 (Acts 2009, ch. 591, § 1), concerning the commercial breeder act, expired on June 30, 2014.

Acts 2009, ch. 591, § 3(b) provided that the act, which added title 44, ch. 17, part 7 and §47-18-130, shall terminate and expire on June 30, 2014. The comptroller of the treasury is urged to study the implementation and impact of the provisions of the act as it implements the licensing of commercial breeders of dogs and cats. As a part of the study, the comptroller shall examine the benefits afforded to the public by the licensing of commercial breeders, the health of dogs and cats maintained by these commercial breeders, and the impact upon the costs of dogs and cats that are sold to the public by these commercial breeders. If a study is conducted, the comptroller shall report any findings and recommendations of the study to the general assembly on or before January 15, 2014.

44-17-702. [Expired.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 7, §§44-17-701 —44-17-715 (Acts 2009, ch. 591, § 1), concerning the commercial breeder act, expired on June 30, 2014.

Acts 2009, ch. 591, § 3(b) provided that the act, which added title 44, ch. 17, part 7 and §47-18-130, shall terminate and expire on June 30, 2014. The comptroller of the treasury is urged to study the implementation and impact of the provisions of the act as it implements the licensing of commercial breeders of dogs and cats. As a part of the study, the comptroller shall examine the benefits afforded to the public by the licensing of commercial breeders, the health of dogs and cats maintained by these commercial breeders, and the impact upon the costs of dogs and cats that are sold to the public by these commercial breeders. If a study is conducted, the comptroller shall report any findings and recommendations of the study to the general assembly on or before January 15, 2014.

44-17-703. [Expired.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 7, §§44-17-701 —44-17-715 (Acts 2009, ch. 591, § 1), concerning the commercial breeder act, expired on June 30, 2014.

Acts 2009, ch. 591, § 3(b) provided that the act, which added title 44, ch. 17, part 7 and §47-18-130, shall terminate and expire on June 30, 2014. The comptroller of the treasury is urged to study the implementation and impact of the provisions of the act as it implements the licensing of commercial breeders of dogs and cats. As a part of the study, the comptroller shall examine the benefits afforded to the public by the licensing of commercial breeders, the health of dogs and cats maintained by these commercial breeders, and the impact upon the costs of dogs and cats that are sold to the public by these commercial breeders. If a study is conducted, the comptroller shall report any findings and recommendations of the study to the general assembly on or before January 15, 2014.

44-17-704. [Expired.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 7, §§44-17-701 —44-17-715 (Acts 2009, ch. 591, § 1), concerning the commercial breeder act, expired on June 30, 2014.

Acts 2009, ch. 591, § 3(b) provided that the act, which added title 44, ch. 17, part 7 and §47-18-130, shall terminate and expire on June 30, 2014. The comptroller of the treasury is urged to study the implementation and impact of the provisions of the act as it implements the licensing of commercial breeders of dogs and cats. As a part of the study, the comptroller shall examine the benefits afforded to the public by the licensing of commercial breeders, the health of dogs and cats maintained by these commercial breeders, and the impact upon the costs of dogs and cats that are sold to the public by these commercial breeders. If a study is conducted, the comptroller shall report any findings and recommendations of the study to the general assembly on or before January 15, 2014.

44-17-705. [Expired.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 7, §§44-17-701 —44-17-715 (Acts 2009, ch. 591, § 1), concerning the commercial breeder act, expired on June 30, 2014.

Acts 2009, ch. 591, § 3(b) provided that the act, which added title 44, ch. 17, part 7 and §47-18-130, shall terminate and expire on June 30, 2014. The comptroller of the treasury is urged to study the implementation and impact of the provisions of the act as it implements the licensing of commercial breeders of dogs and cats. As a part of the study, the comptroller shall examine the benefits afforded to the public by the licensing of commercial breeders, the health of dogs and cats maintained by these commercial breeders, and the impact upon the costs of dogs and cats that are sold to the public by these commercial breeders. If a study is conducted, the comptroller shall report any findings and recommendations of the study to the general assembly on or before January 15, 2014.

44-17-706. [Expired.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 7, §§44-17-701 —44-17-715 (Acts 2009, ch. 591, § 1), concerning the commercial breeder act, expired on June 30, 2014.

Acts 2009, ch. 591, § 3(b) provided that the act, which added title 44, ch. 17, part 7 and §47-18-130, shall terminate and expire on June 30, 2014. The comptroller of the treasury is urged to study the implementation and impact of the provisions of the act as it implements the licensing of commercial breeders of dogs and cats. As a part of the study, the comptroller shall examine the benefits afforded to the public by the licensing of commercial breeders, the health of dogs and cats maintained by these commercial breeders, and the impact upon the costs of dogs and cats that are sold to the public by these commercial breeders. If a study is conducted, the comptroller shall report any findings and recommendations of the study to the general assembly on or before January 15, 2014.

44-17-707. [Expired.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 7, §§44-17-701 —44-17-715 (Acts 2009, ch. 591, § 1), concerning the commercial breeder act, expired on June 30, 2014.

Acts 2009, ch. 591, § 3(b) provided that the act, which added title 44, ch. 17, part 7 and §47-18-130, shall terminate and expire on June 30, 2014. The comptroller of the treasury is urged to study the implementation and impact of the provisions of the act as it implements the licensing of commercial breeders of dogs and cats. As a part of the study, the comptroller shall examine the benefits afforded to the public by the licensing of commercial breeders, the health of dogs and cats maintained by these commercial breeders, and the impact upon the costs of dogs and cats that are sold to the public by these commercial breeders. If a study is conducted, the comptroller shall report any findings and recommendations of the study to the general assembly on or before January 15, 2014.

44-17-708. [Expired.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 7, §§44-17-701 —44-17-715 (Acts 2009, ch. 591, § 1), concerning the commercial breeder act, expired on June 30, 2014.

Acts 2009, ch. 591, § 3(b) provided that the act, which added title 44, ch. 17, part 7 and §47-18-130, shall terminate and expire on June 30, 2014. The comptroller of the treasury is urged to study the implementation and impact of the provisions of the act as it implements the licensing of commercial breeders of dogs and cats. As a part of the study, the comptroller shall examine the benefits afforded to the public by the licensing of commercial breeders, the health of dogs and cats maintained by these commercial breeders, and the impact upon the costs of dogs and cats that are sold to the public by these commercial breeders. If a study is conducted, the comptroller shall report any findings and recommendations of the study to the general assembly on or before January 15, 2014.

44-17-709. [Expired.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 7, §§44-17-701 —44-17-715 (Acts 2009, ch. 591, § 1), concerning the commercial breeder act, expired on June 30, 2014.

Acts 2009, ch. 591, § 3(b) provided that the act, which added title 44, ch. 17, part 7 and §47-18-130, shall terminate and expire on June 30, 2014. The comptroller of the treasury is urged to study the implementation and impact of the provisions of the act as it implements the licensing of commercial breeders of dogs and cats. As a part of the study, the comptroller shall examine the benefits afforded to the public by the licensing of commercial breeders, the health of dogs and cats maintained by these commercial breeders, and the impact upon the costs of dogs and cats that are sold to the public by these commercial breeders. If a study is conducted, the comptroller shall report any findings and recommendations of the study to the general assembly on or before January 15, 2014.

44-17-710. [Expired.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 7, §§44-17-701 —44-17-715 (Acts 2009, ch. 591, § 1), concerning the commercial breeder act, expired on June 30, 2014.

Acts 2009, ch. 591, § 3(b) provided that the act, which added title 44, ch. 17, part 7 and §47-18-130, shall terminate and expire on June 30, 2014. The comptroller of the treasury is urged to study the implementation and impact of the provisions of the act as it implements the licensing of commercial breeders of dogs and cats. As a part of the study, the comptroller shall examine the benefits afforded to the public by the licensing of commercial breeders, the health of dogs and cats maintained by these commercial breeders, and the impact upon the costs of dogs and cats that are sold to the public by these commercial breeders. If a study is conducted, the comptroller shall report any findings and recommendations of the study to the general assembly on or before January 15, 2014.

44-17-711. [Expired.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 7, §§44-17-701 —44-17-715 (Acts 2009, ch. 591, § 1), concerning the commercial breeder act, expired on June 30, 2014.

Acts 2009, ch. 591, § 3(b) provided that the act, which added title 44, ch. 17, part 7 and §47-18-130, shall terminate and expire on June 30, 2014. The comptroller of the treasury is urged to study the implementation and impact of the provisions of the act as it implements the licensing of commercial breeders of dogs and cats. As a part of the study, the comptroller shall examine the benefits afforded to the public by the licensing of commercial breeders, the health of dogs and cats maintained by these commercial breeders, and the impact upon the costs of dogs and cats that are sold to the public by these commercial breeders. If a study is conducted, the comptroller shall report any findings and recommendations of the study to the general assembly on or before January 15, 2014.

44-17-712. [Expired.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 7, §§44-17-701 —44-17-715 (Acts 2009, ch. 591, § 1), concerning the commercial breeder act, expired on June 30, 2014.

Acts 2009, ch. 591, § 3(b) provided that the act, which added title 44, ch. 17, part 7 and §47-18-130, shall terminate and expire on June 30, 2014. The comptroller of the treasury is urged to study the implementation and impact of the provisions of the act as it implements the licensing of commercial breeders of dogs and cats. As a part of the study, the comptroller shall examine the benefits afforded to the public by the licensing of commercial breeders, the health of dogs and cats maintained by these commercial breeders, and the impact upon the costs of dogs and cats that are sold to the public by these commercial breeders. If a study is conducted, the comptroller shall report any findings and recommendations of the study to the general assembly on or before January 15, 2014.

44-17-713. [Expired.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 7, §§44-17-701 —44-17-715 (Acts 2009, ch. 591, § 1), concerning the commercial breeder act, expired on June 30, 2014.

Acts 2009, ch. 591, § 3(b) provided that the act, which added title 44, ch. 17, part 7 and §47-18-130, shall terminate and expire on June 30, 2014. The comptroller of the treasury is urged to study the implementation and impact of the provisions of the act as it implements the licensing of commercial breeders of dogs and cats. As a part of the study, the comptroller shall examine the benefits afforded to the public by the licensing of commercial breeders, the health of dogs and cats maintained by these commercial breeders, and the impact upon the costs of dogs and cats that are sold to the public by these commercial breeders. If a study is conducted, the comptroller shall report any findings and recommendations of the study to the general assembly on or before January 15, 2014.

44-17-714. [Expired.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 7, §§44-17-701 —44-17-715 (Acts 2009, ch. 591, § 1), concerning the commercial breeder act, expired on June 30, 2014.

Acts 2009, ch. 591, § 3(b) provided that the act, which added title 44, ch. 17, part 7 and §47-18-130, shall terminate and expire on June 30, 2014. The comptroller of the treasury is urged to study the implementation and impact of the provisions of the act as it implements the licensing of commercial breeders of dogs and cats. As a part of the study, the comptroller shall examine the benefits afforded to the public by the licensing of commercial breeders, the health of dogs and cats maintained by these commercial breeders, and the impact upon the costs of dogs and cats that are sold to the public by these commercial breeders. If a study is conducted, the comptroller shall report any findings and recommendations of the study to the general assembly on or before January 15, 2014.

44-17-715. [Expired.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 7, §§44-17-701 —44-17-715 (Acts 2009, ch. 591, § 1), concerning the commercial breeder act, expired on June 30, 2014.

Acts 2009, ch. 591, § 3(b) provided that the act, which added title 44, ch. 17, part 7 and §47-18-130, shall terminate and expire on June 30, 2014. The comptroller of the treasury is urged to study the implementation and impact of the provisions of the act as it implements the licensing of commercial breeders of dogs and cats. As a part of the study, the comptroller shall examine the benefits afforded to the public by the licensing of commercial breeders, the health of dogs and cats maintained by these commercial breeders, and the impact upon the costs of dogs and cats that are sold to the public by these commercial breeders. If a study is conducted, the comptroller shall report any findings and recommendations of the study to the general assembly on or before January 15, 2014.